Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.175.160

PASS program—Information regarding funds and awards—Development of strategies for dropout prevention and reengagement programs, planning, and improvement.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction must regularly inform high schools and school districts about the opportunities under RCW 28A.175.135 to receive funding to implement programs that have been proven to reduce dropout rates and increase graduation rates, as well as the opportunities under RCW 28A.175.145 for high schools to receive a financial incentive for success. Within available funds, the office shall develop systemic, ongoing strategies for identifying and disseminating successful dropout prevention and reengagement programs and strategies and for incorporating dropout prevention and reengagement into high school and school district strategic planning and improvement. The office may offer support and assistance to schools and districts through regional networks. The office shall make every effort to keep dropout prevention and reduction of the dropout rate a top priority for school directors, administrators, and teachers.

[ 2011 c 288 s 8.]